Wisconsin, session 2025, SB225.
do enact as follows:SB225,13Section 1. 101.05 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB225,2,24101.05 (7) Notwithstanding ss. 101.02 (15), 101.12 (1), and 101.17 (1), ss. 5101.02 (15), 101.12 (1), and 101.17 (1) do not apply to an amusement ride that is 1installed according to the manufacturer’s recommended standards and located at a 2campground licensed under s. 97.67.SB225,2,33